Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2533
Bond issuance; procedure.

Bonds shall be authorized by resolution of the board and may be issued under a resolution, indenture, or other security instrument in one or more series and shall bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times, bear interest at such rate or rates, be in such denomination or denominations, be in such form, either coupon or registered, carry such conversion or registration privileges, have such rank or priority, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment and at such place or places, and be subject to such terms of redemption, with or without premium, as such resolution, indenture, or other security instrument may provide and without limitation by any other law limiting amounts, maturities, or interest rates. Any officer authorized or designated to sign, countersign, execute, or attest any bond or any coupon may utilize a facsimile signature.

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 33.